District of Columbia statutes.
21-591

Offenses and penalties.

Whoever:

(1)

without probable cause for believing a person to be mentally ill:

(A)

causes or conspires with or assists another person to cause the hospitalization, under this chapter, of the person first referred to; or

(B)

executes a petition, application, or certificate pursuant to this chapter, by which he secures or attempts to secure the apprehension, hospitalization, detention, or restraint of the person first referred to;

or

(2)

causes or conspires with or assists another person to cause the denial to a person of a right accorded to him by this chapter;

or

(3)

being a physician, psychiatrist or qualified psychologist, knowingly makes a false certificate or application pursuant to this chapter as to the mental condition of a person —

shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisoned not more than three years, or both.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 11(a)(20), 30 DCR 5778
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 282, 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-591.
1973 Ed., § 21-591.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $5,000” in the last line.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 282 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.